Maryland, session 2025, SB0366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
13–604.1.
(a) In this section, “person” includes a political committee.
(b) The State Board may impose a civil penalty in accordance with this section for
the following violations:
(1) making a disbursement in a manner not authorized in § 13–218(b)(2),
(c), and (d) of this title;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0366*

SENATE BILL 366
(2) failure to maintain a campaign bank account as required in § 13–220(a)
of this title;
(3) making a disbursement by a method not authorized in § 13–220(d) of
this title;
(4) failure to maintain detailed and accurate account books and records as
required in § 13–221 of this title;
(5) fund–raising during the General Assembly session in a manner not
authorized in § 13–235 of this title;
(6) failure to report all contributions received and expenditures made as
required in § 13–304(b) of this title;
(7) failure to include an authority line on campaign material as required in
§ 13–401 of this title;
(8) failure to retain a copy of campaign material as required in § 13–403 of
this title;
(9) failure to include a disclosure on online campaign material as required
in § 13–401.1(b) of this title;
(10) soliciting a recurring contribution or donation without the affirmative
consent of the contributor or donor as required in § 13–244 of this title;
(11) making a monetary contribution or monetary donation using any
currency other than United States currency or accepting a monetary contribution or
monetary donation made using any currency other than United States currency in violation
of § 13–238 of this title; and
(12) making a monetary expenditure using any currency other than United
States currency in violation of § 13–250 of this title.
(c) A civil penalty imposed under this section for a violation specified in
subsection (b) of this section is in addition to any other sanction provided by law.
(d) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title or as provided in paragraph
(2) of this subsection, the amount of a civil penalty imposed under this section may not
exceed $1,000 for each violation.
(2) As to a violation of § 13–235 of this title, the campaign finance entity
that receives a contribution as a result of a violation shall:
(i) refund the contribution to the contributor; and

SENATE BILL 366 3
(ii) pay a civil penalty that equals $1,000 plus the amount of the
contribution, unless the State Board at its discretion assesses a lesser penalty for good
cause.
[(e) The civil penalty is payable to the State Board by the person charged in a
citation within 20 calendar days after service of the citation.]
(E) (1) IF THE STATE BOARD BELIEVES A PERSON IS COMMITTING OR
HAS COMMITTED A VIOLATION SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
STATE BOARD SHALL ISSUE A “NOTICE OF PENDING CIVIL PENALTY” TO THE
PERSON THAT INCLUDES:
(I) THE NATURE, TIME, AND PLACE OF THE ALLEGED
VIOLATION;
(II) THE MANNER IN WHICH THE VIOLATION IS ALLEGED TO
HAVE OCCURRED;
(III) THE AMOUNT OF THE PENALTY;
(IV) NOTICE THAT THE PERSON MAY ADMIT THE VIOLATION BY
PAYING THE PENALTY AND THE MANNER IN WHICH THE PENALTY MAY BE PAID;
(V) INFORMATION REGARDING THE APPEAL PROCESS
ESTABLISHED BY REGULATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(VI) NOTICE OF THE RIGHT OF THE PERSON ALLEGED TO HAVE
COMMITTED THE VIOLATION TO REQUEST A HEARING BEFORE THE STATE BOARD.
(2) THE STATE BOARD SHALL ADOPT COMPREHENSIVE
REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING AN APPEAL PROCESS FOR PERSONS ISSUED A
“NOTICE OF PENDING CIVIL PENALTY” UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION THAT INCLUDES:
(I) CLEARLY DEFINED GROUNDS FOR APPEAL;
(II) CONTACT INFORMATION FOR ASSISTANCE OR INQUIRIES
REGARDING THE APPEAL PROCESS;
(III) STEP–BY–STEP PROCEDURES FOR INITIATING AN APPEAL;
(IV) TIMELINES FOR EACH STAGE OF THE APPEAL PROCESS;

SENATE BILL 366
(V) CRITERIA FOR THE EVALUATION AND ADJUDICATION OF
APPEALS;
(VI) A RIGHT FOR A PERSON ALLEGED TO HAVE COMMITTED A
VIOLATION TO REQUEST A HEARING BEFORE THE STATE BOARD; AND
(VII) GUIDELINES FOR THE RESOLUTION OF APPEALS AND THE
COMMUNICATION OF DECISIONS REGARDING APPEALS.
(3) THE STATE BOARD SHALL:
(I) PUBLISH THE APPEAL PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY
REGULATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, INCLUDING ALL
RELEVANT FORMS AND INSTRUCTIONS, ON ITS WEBSITE ON A WEBPAGE THAT IS
COMPLIANT WITH THE FEDERAL AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT; AND
(II) PROVIDE PRINTED COPIES OF THE APPEAL PROCESS ON
REQUEST.
(4) THE STATE BOARD SHALL DEVELOP A COMMUNICATION PLAN TO
INFORM AUTHORIZED CANDIDATE CAMPAIGN COMMITTEES AND OTHER PERSONS
OF THE APPEAL PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY REGULATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION THAT INCLUDES:
(I) TRAINING ON THE APPEAL PROCESS FOR RELEVANT STAFF
MEMBERS OF THE STATE BOARD TO ENSURE THAT THE STAFF MEMBERS PROVIDE
ACCURATE INFORMATION ABOUT THE APPEAL PROCESS TO PERSONS ALLEGED TO
HAVE COMMITTED VIOLATIONS;
(II) EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS ON THE APPEAL PROCESS; AND
(III) OUTREACH TO AUTHORIZED CANDIDATE CAMPAIGN
COMMITTEES AND OTHER PERSONS CONCERNING:
1. COMPLIANCE WITH CAMPAIGN FINANCE LAWS;
2. BEST PRACTICES TO AVOID CAMPAIGN FINANCE
VIOLATIONS AND PENALTIES; AND
3. THE APPEAL PROCESS.
(f) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a civil penalty
imposed under this section shall be paid by the campaign finance entity.

SENATE BILL 366 5
(2) If the campaign finance entity has insufficient funds with which to pay
the full amount of the civil penalty in a timely manner, after the campaign account of the
finance entity is exhausted the balance of the civil penalty is the joint and several liability
of the responsible officers.
(3) If a violation is committed by a person not acting on behalf of, or at the
request or suggestion of, a candidate or a campaign finance entity, the civil penalty shall
be paid by the person who committed the violation.
(g) The State Board may issue a citation to [any] A person the State Board
believes is committing or has committed a violation specified in subsection (b) of this section
IF:
(1) THE PERSON ALLEGED TO HAVE COMMITTED THE VIOLATION HAS
EXHAUSTED THE APPEAL PROCESS ESTABLISHED IN REGULATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (E)(2) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) THE STATE BOARD HAS CONDUCTED A HEARING ON THE
PERSON’S APPEAL AND MADE A FINAL DECISION THAT THE PERSON COMMITTED THE
VIOLATION.
(h) (1) The citation shall be served on the defendant in accordance with the
Maryland Rules.
(2) THE CIVIL PENALTY IS PAYABLE TO THE STATE BOARD BY THE
PERSON CHARGED IN A CITATION WITHIN 20 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER SERVICE OF
THE CITATION.
(i) The citation shall contain:
(1) the certification by the State Board attesting to the truth of the matter
set forth in the citation;
(2) the name and address of the person charged;
(3) the nature, time, and place of the violation;
(4) the manner in which the violation occurred;
(5) the amount of the penalty assessed;
(6) the manner, time, and location to pay the penalty;
(7) a statement that the person receiving the citation has a right to trial in
the District Court; and

SENATE BILL 366
(8) the effect of failing to pay the assessed fine or of failing to demand a
trial within the prescribed time.
(j) (1) A person charged in a citation may elect to stand trial for the violation
by notifying the State Board in writing of the person’s intent to stand trial.
(2) The written notice shall be given at least 5 days before the date of
payment as set forth in the citation.
(k) (1) On receipt of the written notice of intent to stand trial, the State Board
shall forward to the State Prosecutor a copy of the citation and the written notice.
(2) The State Prosecutor shall forward to the District Court having venue
a copy of the citation and the written notice.
(3) On receipt of the citation and the written notice:
(i) the State Prosecutor shall assume responsibility for prosecuting
the violation; and
(ii) the District Court shall schedule the case for trial, notify the
defendant of the trial date, and summon the defendant to appear.
(l) (1) If a person charged in a citation fails to pay the penalty by the date of
payment set forth in the citation and fails to deliver to the State Board the written notice
of intent to stand trial, the person is liable for the assessed penalty.
(2) The State Prosecutor, on behalf of the State Board, may double the
penalty to an amount not to exceed $2,000 and request adjudication of the case through the
District Court by filing a demand for judgment on affidavit.
(m) The defendant’s failure to respond to the summons of the District Court shall
result in the entry of judgment against the defendant in favor of the State Board in the
amount set forth in the citation if a proper demand for judgment on affidavit has been
made.
(n) If a person is found by the District Court to have committed a violation:
(1) (i) the District Court shall order the person to pay the penalty set
forth in the citation and may double the amount of the penalty to an amount not to exceed
$2,000;
(ii) the penalty imposed shall constitute a judgment in favor of the
State Board; and
(iii) if the penalty remains unpaid for 30 days following the date of
its entry, the judgment shall be enforceable in the same manner and to the same extent as

SENATE BILL 366 7
other civil judgments for money unless the court has suspended or deferred payment of the
penalty as provided in item (2) of this subsection;
(2) the District Court may suspend or defer the payment of any penalty
under conditions that the court sets;
(3) the defendant shall be liable for the costs of the proceedings in the
District Court; and
(4) the District Court may order the person to abate the violation.
(o) If a defendant fails to pay any penalty or cost imposed by the District Court
without good cause, the District Court may punish the failure as contempt of court.
(p) Adjudication of a violation under this section:
(1) is not a criminal conviction; and
(2) does not impose any of the civil disabilities that arise from a criminal
conviction.
(q) In a District Court proceeding relating to a violation under this section:
(1) the State Prosecutor has the burden to prove that the defendant has
committed the violation by clear and convincing evidence;
(2) the District Court shall apply the evidentiary standards as provided by
law or rule for the trial of civil causes;
(3) the District Court shall ensure that the defendant has received a copy
of the charges against the defendant and that the defendant understands those charges;
(4) the defendant may cross–examine all witnesses who appear against the
defendant, produce evidence or witnesses in the defendant’s own behalf, or testify in the
defendant’s own behalf;
(5) the defendant shall be entitled to be represented by counsel of the
defendant’s own selection and at the defendant’s own expense;
(6) the defendant may enter a plea of guilty or not guilty of the violation as
charged; and
(7) the verdict of the District Court shall be guilty of a violation or not
guilty of a violation, or the District Court may, before rendering judgment, place the
defendant on probation.

SENATE BILL 366
(r) The State Board shall consider the following in determining the amount of a
penalty under this section:
(1) the severity of the violation for which the penalty is to be assessed;
(2) the good faith of the violator; and
(3) any history of prior violations.
(s) Penalties collected under this section shall be distributed to the Fair
Campaign Financing Fund established under § 15–103 of this article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.